Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.030

Courts of record—Sessions.

The superior courts are courts of record, and shall be always open, except on nonjudicial days. They shall hold their sessions at the county seats of the several counties, respectively, and at such other places within the county as are designated by the judge or judges thereof with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court of this state and of the governing body of the county. They shall hold regular and special sessions in the several counties of this state at such times as may be prescribed by the judge or judges thereof.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 60 s 1; 1890 p 343 s 7; RRS s 18.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 77(d), (f).

Courts of record: State Constitution Art. 4 s 11.

Open when: State Constitution Art. 4 s 6 (Amendment 28).